Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.340

Oral history activities—Gifts, grants, conveyances—Expenditures—Joint rules.

(1) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives may solicit and accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises of real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease, exchange, invest, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income from the donations except as limited by the donor's terms.

(2) Moneys received under this section may be used only for conducting oral histories.

(3) Moneys received under this section must be deposited in the legislative oral history account established in RCW 44.04.345.

(4) The secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall adopt joint rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds.

[ 2008 c 222 s 7.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.